Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
Special Designations of Portions of Highway System and Bridges
§ 65-3-71.251.
“Sergeant Eric Andrew Lentz Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of U.S. Highway 51 in Tate County beginning at the north corporate limits of the City of Senatobia and extending northerly to the south corporate limits of the Town of Coldwater is designated and shall be known as the “Sergeant Eric Andrew Lentz Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 401, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 65-3-71.252.
“Roy B. Fulton Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of U.S. Highway 82 in Washington County beginning at its intersection with West Reed Road and extending westerly to its intersection with the Greenville corporate limits is designated and shall be known as the “Roy B. Fulton Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 401, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 65-3-71.253.
“Ricky Murrah Memorial Highway” designated.

The segment of U.S. Highway 98 beginning at the intersection with Donovan/Brushy Creek Road and extending approximately two (2) miles easterly to the intersection of Shipman/Beaver Creek Road in George County is designated and shall be known as the “Ricky Murrah Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching that segment of U.S. Highway 98 in George County.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 444, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 65-3-71.254.
“Sheriff Garry Welford Memorial Highway” designated.

The following segment of U.S. Highway 98 in George County, Mississippi, beginning at its intersection of Mississippi Highway 53 overpass and extending approximately four (4) miles easterly to the intersection of Old Mississippi Highway 63 north is designated and shall be known as the “Sheriff Garry Welford Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching that segment of U.S. Highway 98.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 444, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 65-3-71.255.
Bridge in Lafayette County designated “Veterans Memorial Bridge.”

The bridge that traverses the Little Tallahatchie River on Mississippi Highway 7 in Lafayette County shall be designated and known as the “Veterans Memorial Bridge.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs at each end of the bridge.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 444, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 65-3-71.256.
“Military Order of the Purple Heart Trail” designated.

U.S. Highway 61 that lies in the State of Mississippi is designated and shall be known as the “Military Order of the Purple Heart Trail.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 454, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 20, 2015).

§ 65-3-71.257.
“Dewey Townsend Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of U.S. Highway 51 in Montgomery County within the City of Winona beginning at its intersection with Summit Street and extending northerly to its intersection with U.S. Highway 82 is designated and shall be known as the “Dewey Townsend Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 454, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 20, 2015).

§ 65-3-71.258.
“James Donovan Gautier Jr. Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 57 in Jackson County within the City of Gautier beginning at its intersection with Brown Road and extending northerly to its intersection with Interstate 10 is designated and shall be known as the “James Donovan Gautier Jr. Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 454, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 20, 2015).

§ 65-3-71.259.
“Don Linzy Dixon Gospel Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 27 in Copiah County beginning at its southernmost intersection with Brushy Creek Road and extending southerly to its intersection with Mississippi Highway 28 is designated and shall be known as the “Don Linzy Dixon Gospel Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 454, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 20, 2015).

§ 65-3-71.260.
“Henry Butler Memorial Highway” designated.

The segment of U.S. Highway 61 beginning at the northern city limits of Shaw and continuing north to the O’Reilly Community in Bolivar County is designated and shall be known as the “Henry Butler Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching that segment of U.S. Highway 61 in Bolivar County.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 482, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 65-3-71.261.
“Tom Goode Memorial Highway” designated.

The segment of U.S. Highway 45 Alternate within Lowndes County, Mississippi, is designated and shall be known as the Tom Goode Memorial Highway.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of Mississippi Highway 45.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2016, ch. 318, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 65-3-71.262.
“Fire Chief Mickey Lewis Yates Memorial Highway” designated.

The segment of Mississippi Highway 492 in Newton County, Mississippi, beginning at its intersection with Bill Willis Road and extending westerly to its intersection with the Newton-Scott County Line, is designated and shall be known as the “Fire Chief Mickey Lewis Yates Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2016, ch. 372, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 65-3-71.263.
“Taurean Harris Memorial Highway” designated.

The segment of Mississippi Highway 48 in Amite County, Mississippi, beginning at its intersection with East Jerusalem Road and extending westerly to its intersection with West Jerusalem Road, is designated and shall be known as the “Taurean Harris Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2016, ch. 373, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 65-3-71.264.
“‘Representative Esther M. Harrison Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 182 in Lowndes County, Mississippi, beginning at its intersection with South Martin Luther King Jr. Drive and extending easterly to its intersection with Lehmberg Road is designated and shall be known as the “Representative Esther M. Harrison Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2016, ch. 385, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 65-3-71.265.
“Highway Patrolman Tommy E. Kendall Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of U.S. Highway 49 East in Leflore County, Mississippi, beginning at its intersection with Mississippi Highway 8 and extending northerly for two (2) miles is designated and shall be known as the “Highway Patrolman Tommy E. Kendall Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

Additionally, the Mississippi Department of Transportation is hereby directed to erect a suitable memorial along such segment at a site to be chosen with the approval of the survivors and family of Highway Patrolman Tommy E. Kendall.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2016, ch. 461, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 65-3-71.266.
“State Representative Percy L. Maples Memorial Interchange” designated.

The interchange located at the intersection of Mississippi Highway 63 and Mississippi Highway 26 in George County, Mississippi, is designated and shall be known as the “State Representative Percy L. Maples Memorial Interchange.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs approaching the interchange described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 341, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 65-3-71.267.
“Rockabilly Way” designated.

The segment of Old U.S. Highway 45, also designated as Mississippi Highway 145, in Alcorn, Prentiss and Lee Counties, Mississippi, beginning at the Mississippi-Tennessee state line and extending southerly to its intersection with U.S. Interstate Highway 22, is designated and shall be known as “Rockabilly Way.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 430, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 65-3-71.268.
“Police Chief Willie James Preston Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Mississippi Highway 589 in Lamar County beginning at the Covington/Lamar County line and extending to the intersection of Mississippi Highway 589 and Mississippi Highway 42 is designated and shall be known as the “Police Chief Willie James Preston Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching that segment of Mississippi Highway 589.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 430, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 65-3-71.269.
“Senator George E. Guerieri, Sr., Memorial Bridge” designated.

That bridge on Mississippi Highway 302 in DeSoto County that spans Interstate Highway 55 is designated and shall be known as the “Senator George E. Guerieri, Sr., Memorial Bridge.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the bridge described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 430, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 65-3-71.270.
“Leonard Morris Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 35 within the corporate limits of the City of Batesville, Mississippi, from its intersection with Brewer Road to the point at which it intersects with Interstate Highway 55, is designated and shall be known as the “Leonard Morris Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 430, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 65-3-71.271.
“B.B. King Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of United States Highway 82 in Leflore County from the point of its intersection with Berclair Road to the point of its intersection with Valley of Scholars Boulevard is designated and shall be known as the “B.B. King Memorial Highway.”

The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 430, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 65-3-71.272.
“Juniper Yates ‘JY’ Trice Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 8 beginning at the western corporate limits of the Town of Pace and extending for two (2) miles west of the western corporate limits of the Town of Pace is designated and shall be known as the Juniper Yates “JY” Trice Memorial Highway.

The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 430, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 65-3-71.273.
“Bo Diddley Memorial Highway” designated.

The segment of U.S. Interstate Highway 55 in Pike County, Mississippi, beginning at exit 20A located in Summit, Mississippi, and extending southerly to exit 13 located in Fernwood, Mississippi, is designated and shall be known as the “Bo Diddley Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section on both the northbound and southbound lanes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 430, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 65-3-71.274.
“Senator Alice Varnado Harden Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Interstate 220 in Hinds County beginning at the intersection of Interstate 220 and Interstate 20 and extending northerly to Clinton Boulevard is designated and shall be known as the “Senator Alice Varnado Harden Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of interstate described in this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 430, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 65-3-71.275.
“Senator Henry J. Kirksey Memorial Highway” designated.

That segment of Interstate 220 in Hinds County beginning at its intersection with Clinton Boulevard and extending northerly to Medgar Evers Boulevard is designated and shall be known as the “Senator Henry J. Kirksey Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of interstate described herein.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 430, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 65-3-71.276.
“Dayton Egger Memorial Highway” designated.

The segment of U.S. Highway 82 in Lowndes County, Mississippi, beginning at its intersection with U.S. Highway 45 South and extending westerly to the Lowndes-Oktibbeha County line, is designated and shall be known as the “Dayton Egger Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 443, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 65-3-71.277.
“Howard L. (Boney) Cooley Memorial Bridge” designated.

The bridge that spans the West Tallahala Creek on Highway 18 in Smith County, Mississippi, is designated and shall be known as the “Howard L. (Boney) Cooley Memorial Bridge.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs at each end of the bridge described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 443, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 65-3-71.278.
“Sergeant Jason Vaughn Memorial Highway” designated.

The segment of Mississippi Highway 25 in Tishomingo County, Mississippi, that is within the municipal limits of the City of Iuka, Mississippi, is designated and shall be known as the “Sergeant Jason Vaughn Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 443, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 65-3-71.279.
“Marine Corporal Dustin Lee Memorial Highway” designated.

The segment of Mississippi Highway 513 in Clarke County, Mississippi, beginning at the northern limit of the town of Stonewall, Mississippi, and extending southerly to its intersection with Mississippi Highway 145, is designated and shall be known as the “Marine Corporal Dustin Lee Memorial Highway.”

In addition to memorializing the ultimate sacrifice Corporal Lee made on March 21, 2007, the Legislature also recognizes Corporal Lee’s Military Working Dog Lex, who was wounded in the attack that killed Corporal Lee, earning Lex an honorary Purple Heart Medal. The bond between Corporal Lee and Lex was so strong that the wounded Lex would not leave Corporal Lee’s side and had to be dragged away by corpsmen to be treated, and as such it is only fitting that this memorial highway designation also serve as a memorial for Lex, who reunited with his partner on March 25, 2012.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 443, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 65-3-71.280.
“Johnny Thomas Thornton Memorial Highway” designated.

The segment of Mississippi 15 in Jasper County, Mississippi, beginning at the southern city limits of Bay Springs and extending southerly to its intersection with County Road 12, is designated and shall be known as the “Johnny Thomas Thornton Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 443, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 65-3-71.281.
“Casey Lynne Casanova Memorial Highway” designated.

The segment of U.S. Highway 98 in Pike County, Mississippi, beginning at the western city limits of Summit and extending westerly to the Pike County line, is designated and shall be known as the “Casey Lynne Casanova Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 443, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 65-3-71.282.
“Clyde Whitaker Memorial Bridge” designated.

The bridge on Coley Road Extended/West Barnes Crossing Road that spans Interstate 22 in Lee County, Mississippi, is designated and shall be known as the “Clyde Whitaker Memorial Bridge.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect appropriate signs along and approaching the bridge described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 443, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 65-3-71.283.
“Anne
Moody Memorial Highway” designated.

The segment of MississippiHighway 24 in Wilkinson County, Mississippi, beginning at its intersectionwith U.S. Highway 61 in Woodville, Mississippi, and extending eastto the Amite County line in Centreville, Mississippi, is designatedas the “Anne Moody Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Departmentof Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs alongand approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1)of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2018, ch. 335, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 65-3-71.284.
“John David Pennebaker Memorial Highway” designated.

The segment of MississippiHighway 15 North in Union County, Mississippi, beginning at the NewAlbany, Mississippi, city limits and running north to the Union Countyline, is designated as the “John David Pennebaker MemorialHighway.”

The Mississippi Departmentof Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs alongand approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1)of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2018, ch. 361, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 65-3-71.285.
“Mississippi World War II Veterans Memorial Highway”
designated.

The entire segment of U.S. Highway 49 in Simpson County, Mississippi, is designated asthe“Mississippi World War II Veterans Memorial Highway” in commemoration of the contributions of all World War II Veterans, including the contributions of D’Lo, Mississippi, locatedinSimpson County, Mississippi, as contributing the largest percentage of its citizens of any municipality in the nation to serve during World War II.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section, to include an appropriate sign near the Town ofD’Lo,Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2018, ch. 372, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 65-3-71.286.
“Blues and Heritage Highway” designated.

U.S. Highway 82 withinthe State of Mississippi is designated and shall be known as the “Bluesand Heritage Highway.”

The Mississippi Departmentof Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs alongand approaching the highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2018, HB1208, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 65-3-71.287.
“Larry Grantham Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of United States Highway 27 in Copiah County, Mississippi, beginning at its intersection with United States Highway 51 and extending southeasterly to its intersection with Old Highway 27 #2 is designated and shall be known as “Larry Grantham Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the portion of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2018, ch. 444, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 65-3-71.288.
“William Cleo Pitts Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 63 in Wayne County, Mississippi, beginning at its intersection with Red Brown Drive and extending southerly for one (1) mile, is designated and shall be known as “William Cleo Pitts Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the portion of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2018, ch. 444, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 65-3-71.289.
“Leland Taylor Memorial Bridge” designated.

That bridge on Adams Street that spans Interstate 22 in Itawamba County, Mississippi, in the City of Fulton, is designated and shall be known as “Leland Taylor Memorial Bridge.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain an appropriate plaque at each end of the bridge, and suitable markers along and approaching the bridge, described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2018, ch. 444, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 65-3-71.290.
“Jim Tuttle Memorial Overpass” designated.

That overpass bridge on Mississippi Highway 309 that spans Interstate 269 in Marshall County, Mississippi, is designated and shall be known as “Jim Tuttle Memorial Overpass.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain an appropriate plaque at each end of the overpass bridge, and suitable markers along and approaching the overpass bridge, described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2018, ch. 444, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 65-3-71.291.
“Delta Rhythm & Bayous Highway” designated.

United States Highway 82 in Washington County, Mississippi, is designated the “Delta Rhythm & Bayous Highway” as part of the corridor that connects to the “Delta Rhythm & Bayous Highway” in Arkansas.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the portion of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2018, ch. 444, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 65-3-71.292.
“Raymond Comans Memorial Highway” designated.

The segment of Mississippi Highway 15 in Newton County, Mississippi, beginning at its intersection of Savell Road and extending north to its intersection with Stratton Road, is designated as the “Raymond Comans Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2018, ch. 444, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 65-3-71.293.
“Nicky Lewis Memorial Highway” designated.

The segment of Mississippi Highway 15 in Oktibbeha County, Mississippi, beginning at its intersection of County Line Road and extending north to its intersection with Hatcher Road, is designated as the “Nicky Lewis Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2018, ch. 444, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 65-3-71.294.
“Sonny Merideth Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 1 in Washington County, Mississippi, that extends one (1) mile north and one (1) mile south of the intersection of Mississippi Highway 1 and James Crossing Road is designated and shall be known as “Sonny Merideth Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the portion of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2018, ch. 428, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 65-3-71.295.
“YANKY 72 Memorial Highway” designated.

A portion of U.S. Highway 82 in Leflore County, Mississippi, as designated by the Mississippi Department of Transportation, shall be known as the “YANKY 72 Memorial Highway” in honor of the Marines and the Navy Corpsman who were killed in the crash of a KC-130 aircraft on July 10, 2017.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain a memorial marker provided by the Marine Corps League Department of Mississippi at a location adjacent to Highway 82 that is nearest the location of the crash and the department shall erect and maintain other appropriate signs along and approaching the designated segment of U.S. Highway 82.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2018, ch. 428, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 65-3-71.296.
“Agent Lee Tartt Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 1 within Grenada County, Mississippi, beginning at the intersection of U.S. Highway 51 and Papermill Road and extending northerly to its intersection with Mississippi Highway 7 is designated and shall be known as “Agent Lee Tartt Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the portion of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2018, ch. 428, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 65-3-71.297.
“Winnie Frost Morgan Memorial Highway” designated.

The segment of Mississippi Highway 537 in Jones County, Mississippi, beginning at its intersection with Mississippi Highway 15/Matthews Road and extending northeasterly to its intersection with the Jones/Jasper County Line near the unincorporated community of Moss, Mississippi, is designated as the “Winnie Frost Morgan Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 314, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 65-3-71.298.
“Dalen Keith Thomas Memorial Highway” designated.

The segment of Mississippi Highway 370 in Lee County, Mississippi, beginning at its intersection with County Road 2788 and extending southerly to its intersection with County Road 1503, is designated as the “Dalen Keith Thomas Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 314, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 65-3-71.299.
“Leland ‘L.R.’ Burcham Memorial Highway” designated.

The segment of Mississippi Highway 370 in Lee County, Mississippi, beginning at its intersection with County Road 2788 and extending northerly to its intersection with Mississippi Highway 366, is designated as the “Leland ‘L.R.’ Burcham Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 314, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 65-3-71.300.
“Lenoise Davidson Memorial Intersection” designated.

The intersection of Mississippi Highway 370 with County Road 2788 in Lee County, Mississippi, is designated as the “Lenoise Davidson Memorial Intersection.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the intersection described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 314, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 65-3-71.301.
“Coach Phillip James Jr. Memorial Highway” designated.

The segment of United States Highway 11 in Jones County, Mississippi, beginning at its intersection with the southernmost corporate limits of the City of Ellisville, Mississippi, and extending southerly to its intersection with Hall Street in the unincorporated community of Moselle, Mississippi, is designated as the “Coach Phillip James Jr. Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 317, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 65-3-71.302.
“Glade Memorial Highway” designated in memory of Fred Blackledge and Coach Frank Lucas.

The segment of Mississippi Highway 15 in Jones County, Mississippi, beginning at its southernmost intersection with the corporate limits of the City of Laurel and extending southerly until its intersection with Triangle Drive/Country Circle is designated as the “Glade Memorial Highway” in memory of the late Fred Blackledge and Coach Frank Lucas.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 315, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 65-3-71.303.
“Maj. Ed ‘Too Tall’ Freeman Memorial Highway” designated.

The segment of Mississippi Highway 98 in Greene County, Mississippi, beginning at its intersection with Mississippi Highway 198/Old Highway 98 and extending southeasterly to its intersection with Mississippi Highway 57 South, is designated as the “Maj. Ed ‘Too Tall’ Freeman Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 320, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 65-3-71.304.
“Deputy Donald William Durr Memorial Highway” designated.

The segment of United States Highway 51 in Lincoln County, Mississippi, beginning at its intersection with Lee Drive and extending northerly to its southern most intersection with Cold Springs Lane is designated as the “Deputy Donald William Durr Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 319, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 65-3-71.305.
“James Plemon ‘J.P.’ Coleman Memorial Highway” designated.

The segment of Mississippi Highway 759 in Choctaw County, Mississippi, located in the City of Ackerman, is designated as the “James Plemon ‘J.P.’ Coleman Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 316, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 65-3-71.306.
“Carson W. Bounds Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 16 in Neshoba County, Mississippi, beginning at its intersection with Mississippi Highway 482 and extending eastward to its intersection with Mississippi Highway 491, is designated and shall be known as the “Carson W. Bounds Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the portion of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 406, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 22, 2019).

§ 65-3-71.307.
“Thomas Lee Bales Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of Mississippi Highway 25 from the city limits of Aberdeen, Monroe County, Mississippi, to Highway 382, is designated and shall be known as the “Thomas Lee Bales Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the portion of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 424, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 65-3-71.308.
“Lucie E. Campbell Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of United States Highway 51 within the city limits of Duck Hill, Montgomery County, Mississippi, is designated and shall be known as the “Lucie E. Campbell Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the portion of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 424, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 65-3-71.309.
“Andrew and Mary Lou Hawkins Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of United States Highway 61 within the city limits of Shaw, Bolivar County, Mississippi, is designated and shall be known as the “Andrew and Mary Lou Hawkins Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the portion of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 424, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 65-3-71.310.
“Mayor Johnny Biggs Memorial Highway” designated.

That portion of United States Highway 72 within the corporate limits of the City of Iuka, Tishomingo County, Mississippi, is designated and shall be known as the “Mayor Johnny Biggs Memorial Highway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the portion of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 424, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2019.